Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 7.1 The Paul W. Crowley Rhode Island Student Investment Initiative
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-7.1-1.
Legislative findings.

Legislative intent. (1) The intent of this legislation is to enact a comprehensive state education aid funding program which addresses four (4) fundamental principles:

Closing the inequitable resource gaps among school districts and schools;

Closing inequitable gaps in performance and achievement among different groups of students, especially those correlated with poverty, gender, and language background;

Targeting investments to improve student and school performance; and

Establishing a predictable method of distributing state education aid in a manner that addresses the over-reliance on the property tax to finance education.

(2)

This legislation is further designed to accelerate the implementation of the State Comprehensive Education Strategy. The strategy is an action plan for ensuring that all children achieve at high levels and become lifelong learners, productive workers, and responsible citizens. The standard for expected student achievement is currently being set at a high level both by the board of regents and in Rhode Island’s districts and schools. High standards must be supported and these expectations must now be reached by all our students. All the state’s children must enjoy the success that comes with proficiency in skill and knowledge.

Evaluation of success. Improved student and school performance is the key measure of the success of Rhode Island’s schools. This success cannot occur without investment based on the four (4) fundamental principles as stated in subsection (a) of this section. The success of these investments shall be evaluated based on: accountability for student and school performance; accountability in terms of whether the state’s investment is sufficiently adequate and equitable to support improvement in performance; and on accountability for district and school expenditures.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1.

16-7.1-2.
Accountability for student performance.

The board of regents shall adopt and publish statewide standards of performance and performance benchmarks in core subject areas, to include writing and mathematics (grades four (4), eight (8), and ten (10)). These standards and performance benchmarks shall be ratified by the board and implemented and performance standards and performance benchmarks for reading in two (2) grades shall be added.

Districts and schools need to be held accountable for student performance results. Therefore, every school district receiving state education aid under this title shall develop a district strategic plan. The district strategic plan shall: (1) Be based on high academic standards for student performance consistent with the statewide standards and benchmarks; (2) Be the product of a shared communitywide process that defines a vision of what students should know and be able to do; (3) Address the needs of each school in the district; (4) Encourage the development of school-based improvement planning and implementation; (5) Include a process for mentoring of new teachers; (6) Be designed to improve student achievement with emphasis on closing the performance gaps among groups of students, such as the performance gaps correlated with poverty, gender, language background, and disability; (7) Include establishment of student intervention teams to address the instructional needs of diverse learners, include high standards of student behavior designed to create an orderly educational environment with due regard for the rights of students, and an asset protection plan; and (8) Be consistent with Rhode Island’s comprehensive education strategy. In order to ensure the most efficient use of resources implementing strategic plans, districts and schools are encouraged to work together as consortia and as part of the regional collaboratives.

The strategic plan shall include strategies to improve the performance of students in mathematics, reading, and writing. Each plan must describe a scientific research-based, as described in the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, Title 1, Part B, § 1208 [20 U.S.C. § 6368], reading instruction to improve the reading skills of all students in the early grades (kindergarten through grade five (5)) that is aligned with the board of regents reading policy. The district must develop, implement, and evaluate a personal literacy program for each student in these grades who is performing below grade level. These strategies shall be based on the adequate yearly progress expected for students and schools. Annual performance targets for determining whether schools and districts have made adequate yearly progress will be set by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The general assembly expects these district strategies to increase the number of fourth grade students performing at, or above, the proficient standard in mathematics, reading, and writing in each district and school. The increase shall be established annually in accordance with §

16-7.1-4

.

The general assembly recognizes the contribution of school counselors to positive educational change; to the implementation of the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001; and to the success of students in three (3) developmental domains: academic, career, and personal/social. It endorses the National Standards for School Counseling Programs as developed by the American School Counselor Association (ASCA). Further, the general assembly encourages every district to implement a K-12 standards-based, comprehensive, developmental school counseling program. The general assembly further encourages every district to provide professional development opportunities for school counselors that focus on best practices in collaborating with business, industry, and other community organizations to create internships and apprenticeships for secondary students.

Each strategic plan must indicate the manner in which self-studies will be completed at the school level in accordance with guidelines established by the commissioner. Funds shall be appropriated to the department of elementary and secondary education to assist districts with on-site reviews. Schools to be visited shall be determined by the commissioner.

Each strategic plan must indicate the method in which school administrators and staff shall achieve and maintain an orderly educational environment in accordance with due process and with due regard for the rights of students.

Each strategic plan shall include the development of inter-agency agreements for the coordination of services among state and local agencies responsible for service to children and families. These agreements shall address the identification and provision of services to pre-school children with disabilities and children and youth with behavioral healthcare needs.

All district strategic plans and annual updates shall be submitted to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education no later than May 1 of each year.

All strategic plans shall include strategies to decrease obesity and improve the health and wellness of students and employees through nutrition, physical activity, health education, and physical education. Said strategies shall be submitted by May 1st of each year to the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education and the Rhode Island department of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 74, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 459, § 1.

16-7.1-3.
Accountability for district and school expenditures.

All school districts shall implement a uniform program to track educational expenditures and investments. All school districts shall prepare annual reports of its programs which shall be submitted to the department of elementary and secondary education by July 31 of each year. The business office in each school district shall annually declare that the facts and figures presented in the district expenditure report are accurate to the best of their knowledge. In the event that a report is not submitted within thirty days of July 31, state educational aid to the school district may be withheld. In addition, each school committee shall annually ratify the district expenditure report and transmit the report to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education no later than September 30 of each year. Furthermore, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education in conjunction with the Rhode Island Association of School Business Officials shall determine the feasibility of and implement when appropriate a standard chart of accounts for all school districts. If implemented, the municipalities shall integrate use of this chart of accounts with municipal accounts as appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 1.

16-7.1-4.
Annual report by Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education.

On or before March 31 of each year, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall annually publish a report detailing school district and individual school performance consistent with § 16-60-4(22). This report shall also set annual performance benchmarks. Also, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall report to the house of representatives and the senate, sitting as the grand committee, no later than March 31 of each year, the status of district and school performance, status of the level of the state’s investment in education, and the status of district and school expenditures.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 7, § 1.

16-7.1-5.
Intervention and support for failing schools.

The board of regents shall adopt a series of progressive support and intervention strategies consistent with the Comprehensive Education Strategy and the principles of the “School Accountability for Learning and Teaching” (SALT) of the board of regents for those schools and school districts that continue to fall short of performance goals outlined in the district strategic plans. These strategies shall initially focus on: (1) technical assistance in improvement planning, curriculum alignment, student assessment, instruction, and family and community involvement; (2) policy support; (3) resource oversight to assess and recommend that each school has adequate resources necessary to meet performance goal; and (4) creating supportive partnerships with education institutions, business, governmental, or other appropriate nonprofit agencies. If after a three (3) year period of support there has not been improvement in the education of students as determined by objective criteria to be developed by the board of regents, then there shall be progressive levels of control by the department of elementary and secondary education over the school and/or district budget, program, and/or personnel. This control by the department of elementary and secondary education may be exercised in collaboration with the school district and the municipality. If further needed, the school shall be reconstituted. Reconstitution responsibility is delegated to the board of regents and may range from restructuring the school’s governance, budget, program, personnel, and/or may include decisions regarding the continued operation of the school. The board of regents shall assess the district’s capacity and may recommend the provision of additional district, municipal and/or state resources. If a school or school district is under the board of regents’ control as a result of actions taken by the board pursuant to this section, the local school committee shall be responsible for funding that school or school district at the same level as in the prior academic year increased by the same percentage as the state total of school aid is increased.

For FY 2007, the department shall dedicate one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from funds appropriated to support progressive support and intervention and SALT visits to support the Rhode Island Consortium for Instructional Leadership and Training. This consortium is engaged in training school leaders to be more effective instructional leaders in the standards based instruction environment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 2.

16-7.1-5.1.
Intervention and support for the Providence public school district. [Expires on July 1, 2024.]

No later than September 1, 2022, and in order to assess the Providence school district across multiple measures of district performance and student success, the commissioner shall update the turnaround action plan released June 23, 2020 (the “turnaround plan”), to include measurable annual goals including, but not limited to, the following:

Student attendance and suspension rates;

Student safety and discipline;

Student promotion, graduation, and dropout rates;

Student achievement on the Rhode Island comprehensive assessment system;

Progress in areas of academic underperformance;

Progress among subgroups of students, including low-income students, English learners, and students receiving special education;

Reduction of achievement gaps among different groups of students;

Student acquisition and mastery of twenty-first century skills;

Development of college readiness, including at the elementary and middle school levels;

Parent and family engagement;

Building a culture of academic success among students;

Building a culture of student support and success among faculty and staff;

Recruitment and retention of a qualified, diverse workforce;

Staffing ratios and teacher vacancies;

Health and safety of facilities; and

Developmentally appropriate child assessments, if applicable.

Effective March 1, 2023, and for the duration of the turnaround, the Providence school board shall meet at least monthly, and more frequently if necessary, to provide public input of district performance and implementation of turnaround strategies. The Providence school board shall have, at a minimum, the following powers and duties:

To review and advise the commissioner on the appointment of senior school district administrators, provided that the Providence school board shall not have the authority to appoint senior school district administrators so long as the turnaround plan is in effect;

To advise the commissioner on districtwide policy, provided that the Providence school board shall not have the authority to establish districtwide policy so long as the turnaround plan is in effect;

To review progress toward annual performance measures;

To receive feedback from stakeholders on the implementation of the turnaround plan;

To establish appropriate advisory committees as needed to provide guidance on the implementation of the turnaround plan; and

Any other duties delegated to the Providence school board by the commissioner or the council on elementary and secondary education (the “council”).

The order of reconstitution and control, issued October 15, 2019, shall be authorized for a period of not more than five (5) years from issuance. The commissioner and turnaround superintendent may jointly develop additional components of the turnaround plan and shall jointly develop annual goals for each component of the plan in a manner consistent with this section. The superintendent shall be responsible for meeting the goals of the turnaround plan.

The commissioner and superintendent shall provide a written report to the Providence school board at a minimum, on a biannual basis to provide specific information about the progress being made on the implementation of the district’s turnaround plan. One of the quarterly reports shall include progress toward annual measures, pursuant to this section.

The commissioner shall evaluate the performance of the superintendent on not less than an annual basis. The purpose of such evaluation shall be to assess the implementation of the turnaround plan and determine whether the district has met the annual goals contained in the turnaround plan. The evaluation shall be in writing and submitted to the council and the Providence school board no later than July 1 for the preceding school year.

If the commissioner determines that the district has met the annual performance goals stated in the turnaround plan, the evaluation shall be considered sufficient and the implementation of the turnaround plan shall continue.

If the commissioner determines that the superintendent has not met one or more goals in the plan and the failure to meet the goals may be corrected through reasonable modification of the plan, the commissioner, after consultation with the Providence school board and with the approval of the council, may amend the turnaround plan.

If the commissioner determines that the superintendent has substantially failed to meet multiple goals in the turnaround plan, the commissioner may terminate such superintendent.

The council shall adopt regulations providing for:

The end of turnaround status; and

The transfer of the operation of a school district from the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education to the school committee and municipal control.

The regulations shall include provisions to allow a district to retain measures adopted in a turnaround plan for a transitional period if, in the judgment of the commissioner, the measures would contribute to the continued improvement of the district. Such regulations shall also include provisions that clearly identify the conditions under which such a transitional period shall end and the powers granted to the commissioner and council under this section shall cease to apply to the district.

If, on the basis of the regulations adopted by the council pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the Providence school district has not improved sufficiently to remove the district from turnaround status, the commissioner may, after consultation with the Providence school board and with the approval of the council:

Determine subsequent annual goals for each component of the turnaround plan with the turnaround superintendent, and renew the turnaround plan for an additional period of not more than three (3) years; and

Create a new turnaround plan, consistent with the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 263, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 264, § 1, effective July 2, 2022.

16-7.1-6.
Core instruction equity fund.

The general assembly recognizes that Rhode Island cities and towns primarily rely on the local property tax to finance education programs, and that the state’s highest effective property tax rates are concentrated in the state’s urban communities. Therefore, certain communities, because of low tax capacity and high tax effort, are unable to appropriate sufficient funds for the support of core instructional programs. The general assembly also recognizes the need to reduce inequities in resource distribution among the state’s cities and towns as well as among the state’s districts and schools. Therefore, the general assembly establishes the Core Instructional Equity Fund to improve the capacity of cities and towns to support the core instruction activities that are the basis of daily teaching and learning in all classrooms. The general assembly shall annually appropriate and distribute some sum to meet these needs. The sum shall be distributed based upon the following formula:

Data. Data used for the following calculations are defined as follows:

Population (state and municipal) shall be included from the most recent census;

Equalized weighted assessed valuations (EWAV) from the most recently completed and certified study pursuant to §

16-7-21

;

Most recent tax data certified by the local assessors to the department of administration, and core instructional per pupil cost as determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education;

Most recent resident average daily membership (ADM) pursuant to §

16-7-22

;

Methodology.

Community Property Tax Capacity Index Calculation

Calculate statewide tax rate:

Step 1:

total statewide property tax yield/total statewide property tax base (EWAV) = state average tax rate

Step 2:

calculate statewide yield per capita:

Total statewide property tax yield/state population (most recent census) = state property tax yield per capita

Step 3:

calculate municipal property tax yield per capita:

Municipal property tax yield/population = municipal property tax yield per capita

Step 4:

calculate municipal property tax capacity:

(Municipal property tax yield per capita/state property tax yield per capita) * 100 = Community property tax capacity index

Total Tax Capacity Index Calculation:

Step 5:

calculate community hypothetical property tax yield per capita:

(Statewide tax rate * municipal property tax base (EWAV))/community population = Hypothetical community property tax yield per capita

Step 6:

calculate total tax capacity index:

(Hypothetical municipal yield per capita/state average property tax yield per capita) * 100 = total tax capacity index

Tax Effort Index Calculation:

Calculate property tax effort calculation:

Step 7:

(Municipal property tax yield per capita/hypothetical municipal property tax yield per capita) * 100 = Property Tax Effort Index

Capacity/Effort Index

Calculation of the equity index:

Step 8:

(Property tax capacity index/tax effort index = Equity index

Instructional Cost Per Pupil

Calculate the instructional cost per ADM:

Step 9:

core instructional district cost/district ADM = per pupil core instructional district cost

Step 10:

select the statewide average per pupil instructional cost

Step 11:

state average per pupil core instructional cost - district per pupil core instructional cost = core gap

Step 12:

core gap * ADM = weighted difference.

Eligibility to receive funds. Only those districts which have a gap in instructional core funding and which have capacity of less than 0.50 per the equity index are eligible to receive funds under this provision.

For FY 2003, districts shall receive the greater of the dollar amount received in FY 2002 or the dollar amount calculated as the FY 2003 entitlement. For FY 2003, ten percent (10%) of these funds shall, in addition to the purposes enumerated above, be used to increase student and school performance, and shall be only spent with the prior approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 33; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1.

16-7.1-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 1998.

16-7.1-8.
Student equity investment fund.

The general assembly recognizes the need to improve fourth grade performances in mathematics, reading, and writing. Therefore, the general assembly establishes the Student Equity Investment Fund to target students identified as those requiring additional educational services. The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum and distribute it based on each district’s proportion of resident children eligible for USDA reimbursable school meals relative to the total number of eligible students statewide. For the purposes of this section, the date as of eligibility for USDA reimbursable meals shall be determined by the June report of the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

. These resources shall be used to close student performance gaps in accordance with the district’s strategic plan pursuant to §

16-7.1-2

. Beginning in FY 2003, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may require a district to use up to five percent (5%) of the funds allocated by this section to increase student and school performance. The five percent (5%) set aside funds shall only be spent with the prior approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 7.

16-7.1-9.
Student language assistance investment fund.

The general assembly recognizes the strength Rhode Island’s growing cultural diversity brings to the overall economic and social health of the state. Therefore, the general assembly establishes the Student Language Assistance Investment Fund to target state resources to assist students who require additional language educational services. The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum and distribute it based on each district’s proportion of limited English proficiency students statewide in the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

. These resources shall be used to close student performance gaps in accordance with the district’s strategic plan pursuant to §

16-7.1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 1.

16-7.1-10.
Professional development investment fund.

In order to continue developing the skills of Rhode Island’s teachers, administrators and staff, the general assembly establishes a Professional Development Investment Fund. The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum and distribute it based on a pupil-teacher ratio that shall be adjusted annually by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. School districts, including collaboratives established pursuant to chapter 3.1 of this title, may use funds received under this category of education aid to replace up to, but no more than, fifty percent (50%) of the amount the school district spent for professional development programs in the previous fiscal year. The expenditure of these funds shall be determined by a committee at each school consisting of the school principal, two (2) teachers selected by the teaching staff of the school, and two (2) parents of students attending the school. Schools that enroll students in the early grades (kindergarten through grade three (3)) must expend these funds on the development of scientific research based, as described in the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, Title 1, Part B, Section 1208 [20 U.S.C. § 6368], reading instruction to improve students reading performance.

Schools that have met their performance targets in reading for the current academic year and are not designated as a school in need of improvement, may expend their Professional Development Investment Funds on professional development in the core academic subjects of mathematics, writing, or reading to improve student performance.

Collaborative programs between schools are encouraged. These resources shall be used to close student performance gaps in accordance with the school’s and district’s strategic plan pursuant to §

16-7.1-2

. Additional funds shall be allocated to the department of elementary and secondary education to support teacher and administrator professional development in all districts, including, but not limited to:

Supporting mentoring systems;

Providing school districts with program support to assist teachers in local school districts to improve reading instruction and enhance the integration of reading throughout the curriculum with the goal of improving student performance to high standards;

Support for the design and implementation of leadership development for the teacher to assume leadership roles or ultimately prepare for administrator;

Development of a plan for formal training of school leaders in standards based instruction, school improvement planning, effective use of data in the decision-making process, community involvement and creation of governance structures;

Support for national board certification of teachers, application fees for a certificate of clinical competence issued by the American speech-language hearing association, and grants for coordination and support of school based teacher professional development; and

The practice of scientific research based reading instruction to improve reading performance.

In FY 2003, the additional funds allocated to the department of elementary and secondary education pursuant to this section shall be used only to support the activities described in subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(5) of this section.

Out of the funds appropriated by the general assembly for professional development in subsection (a) of this section, twenty-five percent (25%) shall be set aside for district-wide professional development activities. The expenditure of this district-wide professional development set-aside shall be determined by a committee in each district consisting of the superintendent or his or her designee, three (3) teachers appointed by the collective bargaining agent, and one member of the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education field service team servicing that school district designated by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The expenditure must be aligned with the district strategic plan as well as ongoing professional development programs approved by the department of elementary and secondary education. Collaborative programs between school districts are permissible.

Beginning in FY 2006, professional development funds shall only be spent with the prior approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education upon submission of a district level plan which incorporates the school level plans and which details the use of the funds. These plans shall to the extent possible call for professional development activities that are embedded or do not otherwise encroach upon student instruction time. The requirements of this paragraph shall apply to both district-wide professional development activities and professional development activities determined by the school-level committees.

In FY 2009 payments from the professional development investment fund are hereby suspended through June 30, 2009. Notwithstanding, school districts may continue to maintain professional development programs and may reduce other education programs to achieve savings.

In FY 2010 payments from the professional development investment fund are hereby suspended through June 30, 2010. Notwithstanding, school districts may continue to maintain professional development programs and may reduce other education programs to achieve savings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 400, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 6; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 3, § 1.

16-7.1-11.
Early childhood investment fund.

The general assembly establishes the Early Childhood Student Investment Fund to provide schools and teaching staff for the early grades with resources to begin improving student performance and to provide early care and pre-kindergarten programs. The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum and distribute it based on each district’s proportion of their average daily membership for grades kindergarten through and including third grade in the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

relative to the statewide average daily membership for the same grades in the same fiscal year. For purposes of this section, average daily membership for grades kindergarten through and including third grade is determined in §

16-7-22

. These resources shall be used to close student performance gaps in accordance with the district’s strategic plan pursuant to §

16-7.1-2

. These early childhood investment funds shall be used in coordination with the literacy set-aside funds, chapter 67 of this title. In addition, these funds may be used for early childhood pilot programs, including Child Opportunity Zones (COZs), that; (1) combine and/or leverage some or all of the following state, federal and/or local funds insofar as allowable: student equity investment fund; literacy set-aside; special education funds; Title I funds; and any other appropriate funds; (2) that focus on beginning to improve student performance through developmentally appropriate early childhood education and integrated social and health service support. Funding emphasis for early childhood programs shall be given by the districts to the schools serving concentrations of at-risk students and shall be integrated with programs for special needs students; all day kindergarten programs may be funded; and school links shall be made with programs and students to facilitate full assessment of students’ school readiness and needs prior to entry into first grade and to help receiving schools meet the entering child’s needs. Programs shall include the development and expansion of child care providers, the development of innovative start-up arrangements linked to small businesses, the development of programs and providers in geographically underserved areas, the establishment of before and after school programs with priority to be given to programs linked to schools, to infant/toddler programs, programs related to child opportunity zone family centers, and programs that serve children with special health needs or developmental risks. A district may not fund any program that does not meet standards as established by the board of regents. Districts may contract for services with programs which meet board of regents standards. Any program that receives funds under this section must keep records on the children’s attendance and progress so that data will be available to conduct longitudinal studies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1.

16-7.1-11.1.
Full day kindergarten investment fund.

Beginning in fiscal year 2001, the general assembly shall appropriate and distribute to each locally or regionally operated district a sum equal to the number of full-time kindergarten students reported as a member of each district as of the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16(11)

times a per pupil amount, which shall be:

Fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) for those districts with a tax effort index of below 0.6 as calculated pursuant to §

16-7.1-6

;

One thousand dollars ($1,000) for those districts with a tax effort index of below 1.0 as calculated pursuant to §

16-7.1-6

; and

Five hundred dollars ($500) for all other districts.

Funding under this section shall be in addition to any and all other aid received by the district, including aid received under this chapter, chapter 77.1 of this title, and any minimum increase of aid provided for under §

16-7.1-15

.

For fiscal year 2007, aid received pursuant to this section shall be equal to aid received in the fiscal year 2006 enacted budget by the 2005 general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 7.

16-7.1-12.
Student technology investment fund.

The general assembly establishes the Student Technology Investment Fund to provide schools and teaching staff with up-to-date educational technology and training to help students meet the demands of the 21st century. Rhode Island’s Comprehensive Education Strategy calls for providing support to all schools for educational technology. The funds may be used for: curriculum development to improve teaching and learning, in-service professional development to support the effective use of technology in schools; and infrastructure requirements such as equipment, technology related instructional materials, software and networking of systems. These resources shall be used to close student performance gaps in accordance with the district’s strategic plan pursuant to §

16-7.1-2

and be consistent with the technology plan of the Rhode Island Comprehensive Strategy. The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum and distribute it based on each district’s proportion of their average daily membership in the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

. For purposes of this section, average daily membership shall be defined in §

16-7-22

. School districts may use funds received under this category of education aid to replace up to, but no more than, thirty five percent (35%) of the amount the school district spent for technology related expenditures in the previous fiscal year. District plans for the use of technology shall be reviewed by the legislative technology task force.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1.

16-7.1-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 336, § 2, effective July 3, 2014; P.L. 2014, ch. 337, § 2, effective July 3, 2014.

16-7.1-14.
Joint commission.

The special joint commission established in § 16-79-2 supports the funding program established in §

16-7.1-15

and shall continue to assess its effectiveness as a comprehensive state education aid funding program. The commission will examine the needs of pre-kindergarten aged children and adult education programs. The commission will also examine compensation and benefit programs of persons employed in public education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 1.